Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 7 State-Wide Alert System for Missing Disabled Adults

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202 redesignated former Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 as Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

35-3-170.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mattie’s Call Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Code 1981, §

35-3-170

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’”

35-3-171.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Alert system” means the state-wide “Mattie’s Call” alert system for missing disabled adults and medically endangered persons.

“Disabled adult” means an adult who is developmentally impaired or who suffers from dementia or some other cognitive impairment.

“Local law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the investigation of a missing disabled adult or other medically endangered person.

“Medically endangered person” means a person with a known medical condition that might reasonably cause such person to become incapacitated or that may result in life-threatening physiological conditions likely to lead to serious bodily injury or death if not immediately treated.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-111, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Code 1981, §

35-3-171

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-172.
Development and implementation of state-wide alert system for disabled adults and medically endangered persons.

With the cooperation of the office of the Governor, the Georgia Lottery Corporation, and other appropriate law enforcement agencies in this state, the bureau shall develop and implement a state-wide alert system to be activated on behalf of missing disabled adults and medically endangered persons.

Activation of a state-wide missing person alert system shall not prevent or prohibit any other state or local law enforcement agency from taking additional measures in response to the receipt of a missing person report.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-112, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-172

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-173.
Director to be state-wide coordinator for alert system.

The director is the state-wide coordinator of the alert system.

The director shall adopt rules and issue directives as necessary to ensure proper implementation of the alert system. The rules and directives shall include instructions on the procedures for activating and deactivating the alert system.

The director shall prescribe forms for use by local law enforcement agencies in requesting activation of the alert system.

No rule or directive adopted by the director shall mandate a minimum waiting period before the alert system may be activated or a request by local law enforcement agencies may be submitted to the bureau; provided, however, that it shall remain within the discretion of the director, as provided in this article, whether the alert system shall be activated at the request of a local law enforcement agency.

When making a determination whether to activate or whether to request the activation of a state-wide missing person alert system, both the director and the requesting local law enforcement agency shall take into consideration the known medical condition of the missing person if the medical condition may reasonably be considered a cause for the inability to locate such missing person. In so considering the medical condition of a missing person, particularly if such condition may be immediately life-threatening or incapacitating, the director or other authorized person and the requesting law enforcement official shall be authorized, within his or her discretion, to initiate and request, respectively, a state-wide endangered person advisory.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-113, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-173

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-174.
Time for reporting elopement of disabled person from personal care home and assisted living community.

The staff of personal care homes and assisted living communities shall call the local police department to report the elopement of any disabled person from the home within 30 minutes of the staff’s receiving actual knowledge that such person is missing from the home.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-113.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Code 1981, §

35-3-174

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 24/SB 178; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-175.
Recruitment of media, private and governmental entities, and others for assistance in developing and implementing alert system; contractual agreements for system support.

The bureau shall recruit public and commercial television, radio, cable, print, and other media, private commercial entities, state or local governmental entities, the public, and other appropriate persons to assist in developing and implementing the alert system.

The bureau may enter into agreements with participants in the alert system to provide necessary support for the alert system.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-114, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Code 1981, §

35-3-175

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-176.
Criteria for activating alert system.

On notification by a local law enforcement agency that a disabled adult or medically endangered person is missing, the director shall activate the alert system and notify appropriate participants in the alert system, as established by rule, if:

A local law enforcement agency believes that a disabled adult or medically endangered person is missing;

A local law enforcement agency believes that the disabled adult or medically endangered person is in immediate danger of serious bodily injury or death;

A local law enforcement agency confirms that an investigation has taken place that verifies the disappearance and eliminates alternative explanations for the disabled adult’s or medically endangered person’s disappearance; and

Sufficient information is available to disseminate to the public that could assist in locating the disabled adult or medically endangered person.

The area of the alert may be less than state wide if the director determines that the nature of the event makes it probable that the disabled adult or medically endangered person did not leave a certain geographic location.

The bureau may modify the criteria described by subsection (a) of this Code section as necessary for the proper implementation of the alert system.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-115, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-176

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-177.
Verification that criteria for activation have been met.

Before requesting activation of the alert system, a law enforcement agency shall verify that the criteria described by subsection (a) of Code Section 35-3-176 have been satisfied. The law enforcement agency shall assess the appropriate boundaries of the alert, based on the nature of the disabled adult or medically endangered person and the circumstances surrounding the disappearance. On verification of the criteria, the law enforcement agency shall immediately contact the bureau to request activation and shall supply the necessary information on the forms prescribed by the director.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-116, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-177

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-178.
Obligations of agencies participating in alert system; participation of Georgia Lottery Corporation in disseminating alert information through retail establishments.

A state agency participating in the alert system shall:

Cooperate with the bureau and assist in developing and implementing the alert system;

Establish a plan for providing relevant information to its officers, investigators, or employees, as appropriate, once the alert system has been activated; and

Utilize a rapid response telephone system that alerts residents in a targeted area.

The Georgia Lottery Corporation is directed to develop a method of notifying its vendors within an alert area of an alert in a manner designed to disseminate alert information to customers at its retail locations.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-117, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-178

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-179.
Termination of alert system with respect to particular disabled adult or medically endangered person.

The director shall terminate any activation of the alert system with respect to a particular disabled adult or medically endangered person if:

The person is located or the disappearance is otherwise resolved; or

The director determines that the alert system is no longer an effective tool for locating and recovering the disabled adult or medically endangered person.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-118, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38/SB 103; Code 1981, §

35-3-179

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”

35-3-180.
Immunity from civil damages for dissemination of alert information.

Any entity or individual participating in the “Mattie’s call” alert system pursuant to this article shall not be liable for any civil damages arising from the dissemination of any alert generated pursuant to the “Mattie’s call” alert system.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or restrict in any way any legal protection an individual or entity may have under any other law for disseminating any information.

History.

Code 1981, § 38-3-119, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 539, § 1/HB 728; Code 1981, §

35-3-180

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 3/SB 23.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 704, § 1/SB 23, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Stacey Nicole English Act.’ ”